fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Supports d’enregistrement vierges: Cassettes audio vierges; Disques Blu-ray vierges; CD vierges; DVD vierges; Disquettes vierges; Cassettes VHS vierges
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Üres adathordozó: Üres audiokazetták; Üres Blu-ray-lemezek; Üres CD-k; Üres DVD-k; Üres floppylemezek; Üres VHS-kazetták
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Soportes multimedia vírgenes: Casetes de audio en blanco; Discos Blu-ray en blanco; CD en blanco; DVD en blanco; Disquetes en blanco; Cintas VHS en blanco
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 空白片/帶: 空白錄音帶; 空白藍光光碟; 空白 CD; 空白 DVD; 空白磁片; 空白 VHS 錄影帶
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Leermedien: Leerkassetten; Leere Blu-ray-Discs; Leere CDs; Leere DVDs; Leere Disketten; Leere VHS-Kassetten
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Suporturi media goale: Casete audio goale; Discuri Blu-ray goale; CD-uri goale; DVD-uri goale; Dischete goale; Casete VHS goale
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สื่อเปล่า: เทปคาสเซ็ตเสียงเปล่า; แผ่นบลูเรย์เปล่า; แผ่น CD เปล่า; แผ่น DVD เปล่า; แผ่นฟล็อปปีดิสก์เปล่า; เทป VHS เปล่า
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Prázdná média: Prázdné audiokazety; Prázdné Blu-ray disky; Prázdné CD; Prázdné DVD; Prázdné diskety; Prázdné VHS kazety
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > 記録用メディア: 未記録オーディオカセット; 未記録ブルーレイディスク; 未記録CD; 未記録DVD; 未記録フロッピーディスク; 未記録VHSテープ
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Czyste nośniki: Puste kasety audio; Puste płyty Blu-ray; Puste płyty CD; Puste płyty DVD; Puste dyskietki; Puste kasety VHS
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 空白光碟: 空白音频磁带; 空白蓝光光盘; 空白 CD; 空白 DVD; 空白软盘; 空白 VHS 录像带
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Lege media: Blanco audiocassettes; Blanco Blu-ray discs; Blanco CD's; Blanco DVD's; Blanco diskettes; Blanco VHS banden
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Tomma lagringsmedia: Tomma ljudkassetter; Tomma Blu-ray-skivor; Tomma CD-skivor; Tomma DVD-skivor; Tomma disketter; Tomma VHS-kassetter
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Supporti vergini: Cassette audio vuote; Dischi Blu-ray vuoti; CD vuoti; DVD vuoti; Dischetti floppy vuoti; Cassette VHS vuote
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tallentamattomat tallennusvälineet: Tyhjiä audiokasetteja; Tyhjiä Blu-ray-levyjä; Tyhjiä CD-levyjä; Tyhjiä DVD-levyjä; Tyhjiä levykkeitä; Tyhjiä VHS-kasetteja
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Boş Ortamlar: Boş Ses Kasetleri; Boş Blu-ray Diskler; Boş CD'ler; Boş DVD'ler; Boş Disketler; Boş VHS Kasetler
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Чистые носители: Чистые аудиокассеты; Чистые диски Blu-ray; Чистые компакт-диски; Чистые DVD-диски; Чистые дискеты; Чистые видеокассеты VHS
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 공 미디어: 빈 오디오 카세트; 빈 블루레이 디스크; 빈 CD; 빈 DVD; 빈 플로피 디스크; 빈 VHS 테이프
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Blank Media: Blank Audio Cassettes; Blank Blu-ray Discs; Blank CDs; Blank DVDs; Blank Floppy Disks; Blank VHS Tapes
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Prázdne médium: Prázdne audio kazety; Prázdne Blu-ray disky; Prázdne CD; Prázdne DVD; Prázdne diskety; Prázdne VHS kazety
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Suportes multimédia graváveis: Cassetes áudio virgens; Discos blu-ray virgens; Cds virgens; Dvds virgens; Disquetes virgens; Cassetes vhs virgens
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Κενά μέσα: Κενές κασέτες ήχου; Κενοί δίσκοι Blu-ray; Κενά CD; Κενά DVD; Κενές δισκέτες; Κενές κασέτες VHS
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Blanke medier: Blanke lydkassetter; Blanke Blu-ray-plater; Blanke CD-er; Blanke DVD-er; Blanke disketter; Blanke VHS-bånd
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Prazni nosilci: Prazne avdio kasete; Prazni Blu-ray diski; Prazni CD-ji; Prazni DVD-ji; Prazne diskete; Prazne VHS kasete
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Prazni mediji: Prazne audiokasete; Prazni Blu-ray diskovi; Prazni CD-ovi; Prazni DVD-ovi; Prazne diskete; Prazne VHS kasete
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Tomme medier: Tomme lydkassetter; Tomme Blu-ray-skiver; Tomme CD'er; Tomme DVD'er; Tomme disketter; Tomme VHS bånd
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Mídia virgem: Fitas cassete de áudio virgens; Discos Blu-ray virgens; CDs virgens; DVDs virgens; Disquetes virgens; Fitas VHS virgens
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Đĩa/băng trắng: Cassette âm thanh trống; Đĩa Blu-ray trống; Đĩa CD trống; Đĩa DVD trống; Đĩa mềm trống; Băng VHS trống
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Tuščios laikmenos: Tuščios garso kasetės; Tušti Blu-ray diskai; Tušti CD; Tušti DVD; Tuščios disketės; Tuščios VHS juostos
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Празни носители: Празни аудио касети; Празни Blu-ray дискове; Празни CD дискове; Празни DVD дискове; Празни дискети; Празни VHS касети